Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 29 Inmates of State Facilities
12-29-118. Punitive isolation or solitary confinement of inmates who are minors — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Minor” means a person who is under eighteen (18) years of age;

“Punitive isolation” means the placement of a minor in a location that is separate from the general population as a punishment; and

“Solitary confinement” means the isolation of a minor in a cell separate from the general population as a punishment.

A minor who is an inmate at a state correctional facility shall not be placed in punitive isolation or solitary confinement as a disciplinary measure for more than twenty-four (24) hours unless the:

Placement of the minor in punitive isolation or solitary confinement is due to:

A physical or sexual assault committed by the minor while in the state correctional facility;

Conduct of the minor that poses a direct threat to the safety of a person or a clear threat to the safe and secure operation of the state correctional facility; or

The minor escaping or attempting to escape from the state correctional facility; and

Warden of the state correctional facility or his or her designee provides written authorization to place the minor in punitive isolation or solitary confinement for more than twenty-four (24) hours.

The warden of the state correctional facility or his or her designee shall provide the written authorization described in subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section for every twenty-four-hour period during which the minor remains in solitary confinement after the initial twenty-four (24) hours.

The Board of Corrections shall retain the authority to govern and supervise the administration of the responsibilities of the board before July 24, 2019, including without limitation the administration of the state penal institutions under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 33.

Cross References. Local correctional facilities, good time allowance, §12-41-101 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1971, No. 510, § 8: approved Apr. 2, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly finds that there is an immediate need for ‘meritorious good time’ awards to encourage good discipline, good behavior and efficiency within the institution. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its enactment.”

Acts 1993, Nos. 536 and 558, § 7: Jan. 1, 1994.

Acts 2003, No. 1005, § 2: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is serious overcrowding in the Department of Correction facilities and that such overcrowding is likely to worsen unless appropriate action is taken immediately; that this act is immediately necessary because it is designed to allow a procedure for helping to alleviate this problem. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Meritorious good time will not be applied to reduce the length of a sentence.

Meritorious good time shall apply to an inmate's transfer eligibility date from the Division of Correction or a community correction facility.

Meritorious good time shall under no circumstances reduce an inmate's time served in prison by more than one-half (½) of the percentage required by law for transfer eligibility.

Meritorious good time shall under no circumstances reduce an inmate's confinement in a community correction facility by more than one-half (½).

The Division of Correction or the Division of Community Correction shall determine a date on which the inmate who has acquired the maximum amount of meritorious good time necessary is to be administratively transferred to a less restrictive placement or supervision level within the Division of Community Correction.

This date will be determined in accordance with the policies developed by the Arkansas Sentencing Commission within the parameters allowed by law.

Inmates under sentence of death or life imprisonment without parole shall not be eligible for meritorious good time under this subchapter but may be pardoned or have their sentences commuted by the Governor, as provided by law.

Inmates sentenced to life imprisonment shall not receive meritorious good time calculated on their sentences unless the sentence is commuted to a term of years by executive clemency.

Upon commutation, the inmate shall be eligible to receive meritorious good time at the rate established by this subchapter.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2011, No. 570, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. The intent of this act is to implement comprehensive measures designed to reduce recidivism, hold offenders accountable, and contain correction costs.”

Publisher's Notes. Former §12-29-201, concerning meritorious allowance, was repealed by Acts 1993, Nos. 536 and 558, § 6. The former section was derived from Acts 1971, No. 510, §§ 2, 3; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 59, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-120, 46-120.1; Acts 1987, No. 506, § 1.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “§16-93-615” for “§16-93-206” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” throughout the section.

Because this section, changing how meritorious good-time credit was applied, did not impliedly repeal the language in §16-90-121 (the deadly-weapon enhancement statute applicable at the time of an inmate's sentence), the inmate's 30-year sentence for first-degree murder was subject to reduction by meritorious good-time credit at the conclusion of the first 10 years of the sentence.Hobbs v. Baird, 2011 Ark. 261 (2011).

The trial court properly refused to force the department to credit the petitioner with meritorious good time credits since the exclusive jurisdiction of custody, control, and supervision of all persons in the penitentiary is vested with the Department of Correction. Elliott v. State, 268 Ark. 454, 597 S.W.2d 76 (1980).

Prisoner transferred to Florida pursuant to the Interstate Corrections Compact, §12-49-102, was entitled to good time and other benefits he earned while in Florida as if he had earned them in Arkansas. Hayes v. Lockhart, 754 F.2d 281 (8th Cir. 1985).

Inmate's Class 1-C classification for purposes of calculating meritorious good time under this section did not in and of itself give rise to a constitutional claim where the inmate was unable to show an atypical and substantive deprivation that was a dramatic departure from the basic conditions of his confinement.Crawford v. Cashion, 2010 Ark. 124, 361 S.W.3d 268 (2010).

Cited: Finney v. Ark. Bd. of Corr., 505 F.2d 194 (8th Cir. 1974); Thomas v. Ark. Bd. of Corr. & Community Punishment, 324 Ark. 6, 918 S.W.2d 156 (1996).

State-sponsored general education development certificate program;

Vocational program for which certification is awarded;

Drug or alcohol treatment program offered at a Division of Correction facility; or

Pre-release and other rehabilitative programs or assignments as approved by the Board of Corrections.

(A)The additional days of meritorious good time described in subdivision (d)(1) of this section shall be awarded pursuant to rules promulgated by the board.

The board may make additions, amendments, changes, or alterations to the rules in accordance with the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2011, No. 570, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. The intent of this act is to implement comprehensive measures designed to reduce recidivism, hold offenders accountable, and contain correction costs.”

Publisher's Notes. Former §12-29-202, concerning the classifications committee, establishment of classifications and award of additional good time, was repealed by Acts 1993, Nos. 536 and 558, § 6, effective January 1, 1994. The section was derived from Acts 1971, No. 510, § 5; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 59, § 2; 1981, No. 55, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-120.3; Acts 1987, No. 273, § 1; 1989, No. 429, § 1; 1989, No. 734, § 1; 1991, No. 309, § 1; 1991, No. 571, § 1.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment added (d)-(f).

The 2007 amendment substituted “an amount of meritorious good time sufficient to reduce incarceration time by up to ninety (90) days” for “up to ninety (90) additional days” in (d)(1).

The 2011 amendment by No. 570, in (e), deleted “In no event shall the awarding of” at the beginning, inserted “awarded” and “shall not”, and substituted “16-93-618(a)(1)(A)-(E)” for “§16-93-611(a)(1)(A)-(E)”.

The 2011 amendment by No. 748 substituted “three hundred sixty (360) days” for “two hundred seventy (270) days” in (d)(1); and added (d)(1)(D).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” and made a similar change in (a)(1) and (a)(2); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (c).

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2005 Arkansas General Assembly, Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs, 28 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 365.

This section does not protect an inmate's right to any particular classification; therefore, a reduction of two steps in class as an inmate's penalty for violating a prison rule did not deprive him of due process. Strickland v. Dyer, 628 F. Supp. 180 (E.D. Ark. 1986).

The repeal of a provision that had afforded prison officials the discretion to award additional good-time credits to prisoners did not constitute an ex post facto violation of the defendant's rights. Ellis v. Norris, 232 F.3d 619 (8th Cir. 2000), cert. denied, 532 U.S. 935, 121 S. Ct. 1389, 149 L. Ed. 2d 313 (2001).

Cited: Thomas v. Ark. Bd. of Corr. & Community Punishment, 324 Ark. 6, 918 S.W.2d 156 (1996).

Meritorious good time awarded under subdivision (d)(1) of this section shall not be applicable to persons sentenced under § 16-93-618(a)(1)(A)-(E).

A jury may be instructed pursuant to § 16-97-103 regarding the awarding of meritorious good time under subdivision (d)(1) of this section.

All meritorious good time shall be forfeited by an inmate in the event of escape, and all or part of accrued meritorious good time may be taken away by the Director of the Division of Correction or the Director of the Division of Community Correction, respectively, for infraction of rules.

However, in the event of escape, the Director of the Division of Correction or the Director of the Division of Community Correction, respectively, may restore all or part of any accrued meritorious good time if the escapee returns to the institution voluntarily, without expense to the state, and without any act of violence while a fugitive from the institution.

The Director of the Division of Correction or the Director of the Division of Community Correction, respectively, may restore lost meritorious good time according to rules promulgated by the Board of Corrections.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Subsection (c) of this section, amended by identical 1993 acts Nos. 536 and 558, § 4, effective January 1, 1994, was repealed and replaced by implication.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment inserted “or the Director of the Department of Community Correction, respectively” in (a) and (b), and made stylistic changes.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 971, § 2.

Subchapter 2

— Good Time Allowance

12-29-201. Meritorious good time.

An inmate may be entitled to meritorious good time reducing his or her transfer eligibility date up to thirty (30) days for each month incarcerated after imposition of sentence in one (1) of the units, facilities, and centers maintained by the Division of Correction or the Division of Community Correction.

An inmate transferred or paroled to the supervision of the Division of Community Correction under §16-93-615 may receive meritorious good time reducing his or her time of transfer or parole supervision up to thirty (30) days for each month he or she is under the supervision of the Division of Community Correction.

Meritorious good time shall be allocated under rules promulgated by the Board of Corrections and administered by the respective Division of Correction or Division of Community Correction staff subject to the provisions of this subchapter for good discipline, behavior, work practices, job responsibilities, and involvement in rehabilitative activities while in the custody or under the supervision of the Division of Correction or the Division of Community Correction.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 536, §§ 1, 2; 1993, No. 558, §§ 1, 2; 2003, No. 1005, § 1; 2011, No. 570, § 73; 2019, No. 315, § 896; 2019, No. 910, §
793.

12-29-202. Classification committee — Classifications.

(1)There is established a classification committee to be defined by administrative rules approved by the Board of Corrections.

Members of the committee shall be selected by wardens or supervisors of the various units, facilities, or centers of the Division of Correction and Division of Community Correction per board rule governing their selection.

This committee shall meet as often as necessary to classify the inmates into no more than four (4) classes according to good behavior, good discipline, medical condition, job responsibilities, and involvement in rehabilitative activities.

(1)An inmate who maintains class through good behavior, good discipline, work practices, job responsibilities, and involvement in rehabilitative activities may earn up to one (1) day for every day served as a reduction toward his or her transfer eligibility date for each day incarcerated after the imposition of sentence.

An inmate who is reduced to the lowest class, established through board policy, as a result of disciplinary action shall not be entitled to earn meritorious good time.

An inmate serving a punitive disciplinary sentence in punitive segregation shall not be entitled to earn meritorious good time.

An inmate may be reclassified as often as the committee deems necessary or in accordance with current board rules to carry out the purpose of this subchapter and to maintain good discipline, order, and efficiency at the units, facilities, or centers.

(1)Upon recommendation of the committee, the Director of the Division of Correction may award an amount of meritorious good time sufficient to reduce incarceration time by up to ninety (90) days, not to exceed a total of three hundred sixty (360) days, for each successful completion of a:

History.

Acts 1993, No. 536, § 3; 1993, No. 558, § 3; 1997, No. 876, § 1; 2005, No. 681, § 1; 2007, No. 1413, § 1; 2011, No. 570, § 74; 2011, No. 748, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 897, 898.

12-29-203. Forfeiture — Restoration.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 510, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-120.2; Acts 1993, No. 536, § 4; 1993, No. 558, § 4; 2019, No. 135, § 1.

12-29-204. Statutory good time — Maximum reduction.

No inmate sentenced to the Division of Correction shall ever receive a reduction under this subchapter, or this subchapter and another subchapter jointly, of more than thirty (30) days for each month served except for the additional days of meritorious good time awards authorized in §12-29-202(d).

History.

Acts 1971, No. 510, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-120.5; Acts 2005, No. 681, § 2; 2005, No. 1962, § 49; 2019, No. 910, § 794.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment by No. 681 added “except for the additional days of meritorious good time awards authorized in §12-29-202(d).”

The 2005 amendment by No. 1962 deleted “Those inmates sentenced to the Department of Correction prior to April 2, 1971, shall be entitled to “statutory good time” as provided in Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 14 [repealed], provided” from the beginning, inserted “sentenced to the Department of Correction” following “inmate,” added “except for the additional days of meritorious good time awards authorized in §12-29-202(d),” and made related changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction”.

12-29-205. Good time earned pending transfer to Division of Correction or Division of Community Correction.

Any person who is sentenced by a circuit court to the Division of Correction or the Division of Community Correction and is awaiting transfer to the Division of Correction or Division of Community Correction may earn meritorious good time in accordance with law and rules as adopted by the Board of Corrections.

Meritorious good time will only be given for being housed in a jail or similar secure facility while awaiting transfer on the conviction resulting in a sentence from that county.

Meritorious good time will be calculated upon reception within the respective division.

Meritorious good time will be awarded unless the county sheriff of record submits written objections to such award based on the prisoner's behavior, discipline, and the conduct or performance of such duties and responsibilities as assigned by such county sheriff or his or her designated representatives.

This meritorious good time award is subject to all rules regarding meritorious good time including, but not limited to, those rules for forfeiture of meritorious good time as adopted by the board.

Publisher's Notes. Former §12-29-205, concerning good time earned pending transfer to Department of Correction, was repealed by Acts 1993, Nos. 536 and 558, § 6, effective January 1, 1994. The former section was derived from Acts 1987, No. 626, §§ 1-4; 1991, No. 329, § 1; 1991, No. 574, § 1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(1); and deleted “and regulations” following“rules” and substituted “rules” for the second occurrence of “regulations” in (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, in (a)(1), substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction”; and substituted “division” for “department” in (a)(3).

Cross References. Vocational and technical education, §6-50-101 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1973, No. 279, § 9: Mar. 12, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly finds that there is an immediate need for the institution of basic education for inmates of the Department of Correction, to the end that the said inmates may improve their minds and characters and become less likely to commit further crimes. An emergency is therefore declared to exist, and this act, being necessary for the public health, safety, and welfare, shall be effective from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 288, § 5: July 1, 1985.

Acts 1985, No. 751, § 2: Apr. 3, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined that Act 279 of 1973 established the Department of Correction School District for the purpose of providing elementary, secondary, and vocational technical education to all persons incarcerated in the Department of Correction facilities who are not high school graduates, irrespective of age; that subsection (b) of Section 3 of Act 279 of 1973 authorized the Department of Correction School District to share in Minimum Foundation Program Aid under distribution laws then in effect; that the First Extraordinary Session of 1983 substantially revised the method of distributing Minimum Foundation Program Aid funds to school districts in this state; and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to enable the Department of Correction to be eligible to receive Minimum Foundation Program Aid funds under the latest revisions of the Minimum Foundation Program Distribution Law, and to enable the Department of Correction to continue its eligibility to receive said funds, even though all aspects of the operation of said school may not conform to the quality education standards due to the restrictions on the educational program within such correctional facility. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 671, § 4: Mar. 20, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that confusion has arisen concerning the funding of the public school program operated in the Department of Correction; that it is necessary to clarify that funds generated from various programs within the department may be utilized in support of the public school district within the department; and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to resolve the uncertainty surrounding this issue. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Where plaintiff was employed with the Department of Correction School District as a teacher and was required to have a State teaching certificate as prerequisite to employment, he was a teacher within the meaning of the Teacher Fair Dismissal Act. Allred v. Ark. Dep't of Corr. Sch. Dist., 322 Ark. 772, 912 S.W.2d 4 (1995).

The system's chief administrative officer shall be under the direct authority of the Board of Directors of the Corrections School System.

Subject to the approval of the Board of Directors of the Corrections School System, the chief administrative officer or superintendent of the system shall have supervisory authority over the employees of the system, including, but not limited to, assistant superintendents, principals, and teachers.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1973, No. 279, § 2, provided, in part, that, notwithstanding the other provisions of the act, the adult education programs administered by the England Special School District No. 2, on March 12, 1973, would continue to be administered by that district, and that all federal and state funds received by that district for such programs would be applied against federal and state funds available to the Department of Correction School District under the act.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment, in (a), inserted “and the Department of Community Correction” and “qualified” and substituted “Corrections School System” for “Department of Correction School District”; in (b), substituted “The qualified system” for “This district” and “qualified persons incarcerated … release or transfer” for “all persons incarcerated in department facilities”; substituted “Board of Directors of the Corrections School System” for “school district” in (c); and added (d).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” throughout (a) and (b).

There is no “constitutional right to be ignorant,” and state clearly has the right, through forced school enrollment, to undertake rehabilitation of its inmates through education. Rutherford v. Hutto, 377 F. Supp. 268 (E.D. Ark. 1974).

While the Department of Correction School District is certainly different from other public school districts, it is clear that the General Assembly intended to establish a public school district within the Department of Correction for the benefit of both the free and the incarcerated populations; further, public federal funds and state funds from the Departments of Education and Correction support the district. Allred v. Ark. Dep't of Corr. Sch. Dist., 322 Ark. 772, 912 S.W.2d 4 (1995).

History.

Acts 1993, No. 536, § 5; 1993, No. 558, § 5; 2019, No. 315, §§ 899, 900; 2019, No. 910, §§
795, 796.

Subchapter 3

— Education

12-29-301. School system created.

Properties owned by the State of Arkansas and occupied by the various units of the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction are by this subchapter designated as a qualified school district to be known as the “Corrections School System”.

The system is created for the purpose of providing elementary, secondary, and vocational and technical education to qualified persons incarcerated in facilities of the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction or to qualified persons supervised by the Division of Community Correction, including those on probation and parole or any type of post-prison release or transfer who are not high school graduates, irrespective of age.

The Board of Corrections shall act as the Board of Directors of the Corrections School System.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 279, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-1301, 46-1302; Acts 2005, No. 496, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 797.

12-29-302. Rules.

The Board of Corrections and the State Board of Education are directed, authorized, and empowered to adopt rules as are necessary to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 279, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1304; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 901.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the section heading and in the text.

12-29-303. Privileges of students — Limitations.

A school established under this subchapter and a person incarcerated who attends the school shall be entitled to certain educational privileges provided generally to common public schools and adult education programs administered by the State Board of Education to students who attend the common public schools and adult education programs under the laws of the State of Arkansas, provided the privileges do not conflict with the rules and policies of the State Board of Education, the Division of Correction, and the Division of Community Correction or the laws of the state respecting the establishment and operation of the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 279, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1305; Acts 2005, No. 496, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 798.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment deleted “the provisions of” following “established under,” substituted “certain educational privileges” for “all of the privileges” and “departments” for “department,” and inserted “State Board of Education” and “and the Department of Community Correction.”

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction”, and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” twice.

12-29-304. Costs and funding.

The cost of implementing and operating the Corrections School System shall be borne by the state and shall be paid from funds appropriated by the General Assembly from the general revenues of the state to the Division of Correction, the Division of Community Correction, and the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education, together with any federal funds that may be available for that purpose and from any funds generated from the operations of the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction, in the following manner:

The cost of facilities, equipment, and current operation in excess of the amount of grants and aids received from the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall be borne by the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction as approved by the Board of Corrections; and

The system, as other school districts in the state, shall share in the distribution of grants and aids from the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education.

However, in no case shall the moneys from the Public School Fund to the system be in excess of the line item appropriation provided to the system in the fund.

Recognizing that the primary roles, duties, and responsibilities of the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction are to serve as penal and correctional institutions, the system shall be exempt from and shall not be penalized in any manner for not complying with:

All of the following:

The Quality Education Act of 2003, § 6-15-201 et seq.;

The Arkansas Comprehensive Testing, Assessment, and Accountability Program Act, § 6-15-401 et seq.;

Sections 6-15-901, 6-15-902, 6-15-2001 — 6-15-2008, 6-15-2101 — 6-15-2107, 6-15-2201, 6-15-2301, and 6-16-1201 — 6-16-1206;

The Arkansas Fiscal Assessment and Accountability Program, § 6-20-1901 et seq.; and

The Arkansas Educational Financial Accounting and Reporting Act of 2004, § 6-20-2201 et seq.;

Any state laws or rules adopted to comply with the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act as reauthorized under the No Child Left Behind Act of 2001, 20 U.S.C. § 6301 et seq., as in existence on January 1, 2005; and

Any rule of the State Board of Education related to the provisions listed in this subdivision (b)(1).

The system's exemption from or noncompliance with the provisions under this subsection shall not affect the system's, the Division of Correction's, or the Division of Community Correction's eligibility to apply for or receive state grants or aids for public school districts as authorized in this subchapter and related rules.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment rewrote this section.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and similar language, “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” and similar language, and “Division of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Department of Education” throughout the section.

Cited: Allred v. Ark. Dep't of Corr. Sch. Dist., 322 Ark. 772, 912 S.W.2d 4 (1995).

History.

Acts 1973, No. 279, § 3; 1985, No. 751, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1303; Acts 1989, No. 671, § 1; 1999, No. 391, § 37; 2005, No. 496, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 799.

12-29-305. Gifts and bequests.

The Board of Corrections and the State Board of Education may accept gifts, grants, donations, equipment, materials, bequests, and real and personal property from public and private sources to implement and operate the school program authorized by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 279, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1306.

12-29-306. Riverside Vocational and Technical School — Legislative intent.

This section and §§ 12-29-307 — 12-29-310 are intended to create an additional state vocational and technical school to provide vocational and technical education and training opportunities to qualified persons incarcerated in facilities of the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction or to qualified persons supervised by the Division of Community Correction, including those on probation and parole or any type of post-prison release or transfer.

This section and §§ 12-29-307 — 12-29-310 are not intended to modify or repeal any of the laws of this state pertaining to vocational and technical schools or vocational and technical education.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment inserted the subsection designations; inserted “the Department of Community Correction or to qualified persons supervised by the Department of Community Correction including those on probation and parole or any type of post prison release or transfer” in present (a); and substituted “This section and §§12-29-307 and12-29-310 are” for “is” in present (b).

The 2019 amendment, in (a), substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” twice.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 288, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1307; Acts 2005, No. 496, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 800.

12-29-307. Riverside Vocational and Technical School — Establishment.

There is established a state vocational and technical school, to be known as the “Riverside Vocational and Technical School”, to be operated by the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction at such facilities of the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction as may be designated by the Board of Corrections.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 288, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1308; Acts 2005, No. 496, § 5; 2019, No. 910, §
801.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment inserted “and the Department of Community Correction.”

The 2019 amendment rewrote the section.

12-29-308. Riverside Vocational and Technical School — Purpose.

The Riverside Vocational and Technical School is created for the purpose of providing vocational and technical educational opportunities to qualified persons incarcerated in facilities of the Department of Correction and the Department of Community Correction or to qualified persons supervised by the Department of Community Correction, including those on probation and parole or any type of post prison release or transfer who would be qualified to receive vocational and technical education and training in state vocational and technical schools established by the Career Education and Workforce Development Board under the provisions of §§6-51-201 —6-51-203,6-51-205,6-51-207 —6-51-210, and other laws of this state relative to vocational and technical schools.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 288, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1309; Acts 2005, No. 496, § 6.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “facilities of the Department of Correction … prison release or transfer” for “the Department of Correction facilities.”

12-29-309. Riverside Vocational and Technical School — Facilities — Operations — Rules.

The Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction shall locate facilities and operate vocational or technical education or training programs within the Riverside Vocational and Technical School.

The operation of the school is subject to such special rules deemed appropriate for the operation of vocational or technical education or training programs at the correctional institutions under the control of the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction in accordance with agreements and rules mutually developed and agreed to by the Department of Education and the Board of Corrections.

The school shall be entitled to all funds, rights, and privileges and shall be operated in the same manner as other area vocational and technical schools are operated in this state.

However, the school shall be operated in accordance with the rules for the operation of vocational or technical education or training programs at facilities of the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction as provided in §§ 12-29-306 — 12-29-310.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment, in (a), inserted “and the Department of Community Correction” and substituted “fulfill their” for “fulfill its,” “institutions” for “institution” and “Department of Correction and the Department of Community Correction” for “department”; and substituted “Department of Correction and the Department of Community Correction” for “department of Correction” in (b).

The 2015 amendment deleted “and regulations” at the end of the section heading; and rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction” for “Career Education and Workforce Development Board” in (a)(1); in (a)(2), substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction”, “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” and “Department of Education and” for “Career Education and Workforce Development Board and”; and, in (b)(2), substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction”.

However, nothing in this section and §§ 12-29-306 — 12-29-309 shall prohibit the Career Education and Workforce Development Board from providing facilities or sharing in the cost of facilities and from providing or sharing in the cost of repairing, maintenance, and upkeep of the buildings and facilities with the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction as funds are provided by the General Assembly, or are otherwise available for these purposes.

The school shall be administered under the direction and supervision of the chief administrative officer of the Corrections School System or the Director of the Riverside Vocational and Technical School under the direct authority of the Board of Directors of the Corrections School System.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment inserted “and the Department of Community Correction” in (a) and twice in present (a)(2); substituted “the Riverside Vocational and Technical School, the Department of Career Education, the Department of Correction, and to the Department of Community Correction” for “the Department of Workforce Education and to the Department of Correction” in (a); in (a)(1), inserted “Riverside Vocational and Technical School and the” and “and the Department of Community Correction as approved by the Board of Corrections”; deleted former (a)(2)(A); redesignated former (a)(2)(B) as present (a)(2); rewrote (b); and deleted (c).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” throughout the section; deleted “the Department of Career Education, and to” following “to the school” in the introductory language of (a); and deleted “and the Department of Career Education” following “by the school” in (a)(1).

History.

Acts 1985, No. 288, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1309; Acts 2005, No. 496, § 7; 2015, No. 1198, § 6; 2019, No. 910, § 6340.